Utah statutes.
16-6a-1502.   Consequences of conducting affairs without authority.
(1)  A foreign nonprofit corporation, its successor, or anyone acting on its
behalf, conducting affairs in this state without authority may not be
permitted to maintain a proceeding in any court in this state until an
application for authority to conduct affairs is filed.
(2) (a)  A foreign nonprofit corporation or successor that conducts affairs in
this state without authority shall be liable to this state in an amount equal
to the sum of:
(i)  all fees imposed by this chapter or prior law that would have been paid
for all years or portions of years during which it conducted affairs in this
state without authority; and
(ii)  all penalties imposed by the division for failure to pay the fees
described in Subsection (2)(a)(i).
(b)  An application for authority to conduct affairs may not be filed until
payment of the amounts due under this Subsection (2) is made.
(3) (a)  A court may stay a proceeding commenced by a foreign nonprofit
corporation, its successor, or assignee until it determines whether the
foreign nonprofit corporation, its successor, or assignee is required to file
an application for authority to conduct affairs.
(b)  If the court determines that a foreign nonprofit corporation, its
successor, or assignee is required to file an application for authority to
conduct affairs, the court may further stay the proceeding until the required
application for authority to conduct affairs has been filed with the division.
(4) (a)  A foreign nonprofit corporation that conducts affairs in this state
without authority is subject to a civil penalty, payable to this state, of
$100 for each day in which it transacts business in this state without
authority.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (4)(a), the civil penalty imposed under
Subsection (4)(a) may not exceed a total of $5,000 for each year.
(c)  The following are subject to a civil penalty payable to the state not
exceeding $1,000:
(i)  each officer of a foreign nonprofit corporation who authorizes, directs,
or participates in the conducting of affairs in this state without authority;
and
(ii)  each agent of a foreign nonprofit corporation who transacts business in
this state on behalf of a foreign nonprofit corporation that is not
authorized.
(d)  The division may make rules to carry out the provisions of this
Subsection (4), including procedures to request the division to abate for
reasonable cause a penalty imposed under this Subsection (4).
(e)  If the division imposes a civil penalty under this Subsection (4) on a
foreign nonprofit corporation, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act, the following may appeal the civil penalty to
the executive director:
(i)  the foreign nonprofit corporation; or
(ii)  the representative of the foreign nonprofit corporation.
(5) (a)  The civil penalties set forth in Subsection (4) may be recovered in
an action brought:
(i)  in an appropriate court in Salt Lake County; or
(ii)  in any other county in this state in which the foreign nonprofit
corporation:
(A)  has a registered, principal, or business office; or
(B)  has conducted affairs.
(b)  Upon a finding by the court that a foreign nonprofit corporation or any
of its officers or agents have conducted affairs in this state in violation of
this part, in addition to or instead of a civil penalty, the court shall issue
an injunction restraining:
(i)  the further conducting of affairs of the foreign nonprofit corporation;
and
(ii)  the further exercise of any corporate rights and privileges in this
state.
(c)  Upon issuance of the injunction described in Subsection (5)(b), the
foreign nonprofit corporation shall be enjoined from conducting affairs in
this state until:
(i)  all civil penalties have been paid, plus any interest and court costs
assessed by the court; and
(ii)  the foreign nonprofit corporation has otherwise complied with the
provisions of this part.
(6)  Notwithstanding Subsections (1) and (2), the failure of a foreign
nonprofit corporation to have authority to conduct affairs in this state does
not:
(a)  impair the validity of its corporate acts; or
(b)  prevent the foreign nonprofit corporation from defending any proceeding
in this state.
